bg-BG: Твърдост: Средна; Мека; Твърда; Други
es: Rigidez: Medio; Blando; Rígido; Otros
de: Steifigkeit: Medium; Weich; Starr; Sonstiges
ru: Жесткость: Средний; Мягкий; Жесткий; Другое
ro-RO: Rigiditate: Medie; Moale; Rigid; Altele
fr: Raideur: Moyen; Doux; Rigide; Autre
el: Ακαμψία: Μέση; Μαλακό; Δύσκαμπτος; Άλλο
nb: Stivhet: Middels; Myk; Stiv; Annet
sl-SI: Togost: Srednja; Mehka; Togo; Drugo
sv: Styvhet: Medium; Mjuk; Styv; Övrigt
th: ความแข็ง: สื่อ; นุ่ม; แข็ง; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Standumas: Vidutinis; Minkštas; Standus; Kita
pt-PT: Rigidez: Médio; Suave; Duro; Outro
en: Stiffness: Medium; Soft; Stiff; Other
cs: Tuhost: Médium; Měkká; Tuhé; Jiné
it: Rigidità: Medio; Morbido; Rigida; Altro
zh-TW: 韌性: 媒介; 柔軟; 僵硬的; 其他
ko: 강성: 매체; 부드러움; 뻣뻣함; 기타
hu: Merevség: Közepes; Puha; Merev; Egyéb
da: Stivhed: Medium; Blød; Stiv; Andet
tr: Sertlik: Orta; Yumuşak; Katı; Diğer
pt-BR: Rigidez: Médio; Macio; Rígida; Outro
ja: 硬さ: 媒体; ソフト; スティッフ; その他
pl: Sztywność: Środek; Miękki; Sztywny; Inne
nl: Stijfheid: Medium; Zacht; Stijf; Andere
hr-HR: Čvrstoća: Srednje; Meko; Kruto; Ostalo
fi: Jäykkyys: Keskimääräinen; Pehmeä; Jäykkä; Muu
zh-CN: 刚度: 媒介; 软; 硬; 其他
vi: Độ cứng: Vừa; Mềm; Cứng; Khác
sk-SK: Tuhosť: Stredný; Mäkký; Tuhý; Iné